Utah statutes.
17B-1-305.   Notice of offices to be filled.

On or before February 1 of each municipal election year, the board of each local district shall prepare and transmit to the clerk of each county in which any part of the district is located a written notice that:

(1)  designates the offices to be filled at that year's municipal general election; and

(2)  identifies the dates for filing a declaration of candidacy for those offices.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

